Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5207.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1109. (1) The department shall issue a license as an a barber instructor to an individual who meets either of the following: (a) The individual fulfills all of the following requirements: (i) (a) Is a licensed barber with not less than 2 years of experience. (ii) (b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), has completed 1 year 600 hours of instruction in the teaching of barbering at a licensed barber college instructor training or has successfully completed 60 semester hours or 90 term hours in a course of instruction approved by the board at an accredited college or university and has 6 months of instruction in the teaching of barbering at a barber college. (iii) (c) Has graduated from high school or has an equivalent education as approved by the department. (iv) (d) Has passed an examination approved by the board and the department to determine the individual's fitness to practice as an instructor. (v) (e) Is of good moral character. (b) The individual holds a valid license as a cosmetology instructor under section 1206 and has completed not less than 300 hours of training in a licensed barber college regarding the fundamentals of straight razor shaving and barbering technique. (2) For the purposes of fulfilling the requirements of subsection (1)(b), (1)(a)(ii), an individual who has been duly authorized under the laws of another state, jurisdiction, or country to instruct others in barbering may substitute 1 year 600 hours of experience in barber instruction for the required training. The requirements of subsection (1)(a) (1)(a)(i) and (d) shall (iv) must not be waived based on the basis of prior experience as an instructor. Sec. 1206. (1) The department shall issue a license as a cosmetology instructor to an individual who meets either of the following: (a) The individual fulfills all of the following requirements: (i) (a) Is of good moral character. (ii) (b) Has a high school diploma or its the equivalent of a high school diploma. (iii) (c) Is licensed as a cosmetologist under this article. (iv) (d) Has not less than 3 years of practical experience in natural hair cultivation, hair care services, skin care services, and manicuring services, not less than 1 year of which must be in a cosmetology establishment. (v) (e) Has completed not less than 500 hours of instructor training or, for an individual who begins instructor training on or after July 1, 2024, not less than 600 hours of instructor training. (vi) (f) Has passed an examination approved by the department in consultation with the board. (b) The individual holds a valid license as a barber instructor under section 1109 and has completed not less than 300 hours of training in a licensed school of cosmetology learning the fundamentals of cosmetology technique and services. (2) The department shall issue a license as an electrology instructor to an individual who meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is of good moral character. (b) Has a high school diploma or its the equivalent of a high school diploma. (c) Is licensed as an electrologist under this article. (d) Has not less than 3 years of practical experience in electrology, not less than 1 year of which must be in a cosmetology establishment holding a limited license for the practice of electrology. (e) Has completed not less than 300 hours of instructor training. (f) Has passed an examination approved by the department in consultation with the board. (3) The department may issue a limited instructor's license to an individual who meets all of the requirements of either subsection (1) except for subsection (1)(d) (1)(a)(iv) or subsection (2) except for subsection (2)(d). The holder of a limited instructor's license shall not supervise a school of cosmetology at any time. (4) The department may issue a limited specialist instructor's license to an individual who meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is of good moral character. (b) Has a high school diploma or its the equivalent of a high school diploma. (c) Is licensed as a manicurist, natural hair culturist, or esthetician. (d) Has completed not less than 300 hours of instructor training. (e) Has passed an examination approved by the department in consultation with the board. (5) The A specialist instructor's license shall limit issued under subsection (4) limits the instruction given by that individual to only the service in which the individual is licensed.